Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-706. Annuity options.

Before the date the first payment of his or her annuity becomes due, a member may elect to receive his or her annuity as a straight life annuity, or he or she may elect to receive the actuarial equivalent, at that time, of his or her straight life annuity in a reduced annuity payable throughout his or her life.

The member may nominate a beneficiary, in accordance with one (1) of the following options:

Option A — 100% Survivor Annuity.

Under Option A, upon the death of a retirant, his or her reduced annuity shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to such person as he or she shall have nominated by written designation executed and filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System before the date the first payment of his or her annuity becomes due.

The person designated as a beneficiary by the retirant shall be:

The retirant's spouse for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date; or (b) A dependent child of the retirant who has been adjudged physically or mentally incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Option B — 50% Survivor Annuity.

Under Option B, upon the death of a retirant, one-half (1/2) of his or her reduced annuity shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to such person as he or she has nominated by written designation executed and filed with the board before the date the first payment of his or her annuity becomes due.

The person designated as a beneficiary by the retirant shall be:

The retirant's spouse for not less than one (1) year immediately preceding the first payment due date; or (b) A dependent child of the retirant who has been adjudged physically or mentally incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction; or

Option C — Annuity for Ten (10) Years Certain and Life Thereafter.

Under Option C, a retirant shall receive a reduced annuity payable throughout his or her life with the provision that if he or she dies before he or she has received one hundred twenty (120) monthly annuity payments, the payments shall be continued for the remainder of the period of one hundred twenty (120) months and paid to such persons in equal shares as the retirant has nominated by written designation executed and filed with the board.

If the designated beneficiaries predecease the retirant, the retirant may nominate successor beneficiaries or may elect to return to his or her single lifetime benefit equivalent by written designation executed and filed with the board, to be effective the month following receipt of his or her election by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

If the designated beneficiary is the spouse of the retirant and the marriage ends in divorce or other marriage dissolution, the retirant may:

Nominate a successor beneficiary; or

Elect to return to his or her single lifetime benefit equivalent.

The nomination or election made under subdivision (a)(2)(C)(iii)(a) of this section shall be in writing, executed by the retirant, and filed with the board, to be effective the month following receipt of his or her election by the system.

If no designated beneficiary survives the retirant, the annuity reserve for the remainder of the annuity payments shall be paid to the retirant's estate.

If the last designated beneficiary receiving annuity payments dies before all annuity payments are made, the annuity reserve for the remainder of the annuity payments shall be paid to the beneficiary's estate.

Effective the month following completion of the one-hundred-twenty-month period, the retirant's annuity shall return to his or her single lifetime benefit equivalent.

In addition to the persons eligible to be designated as a beneficiary under either Option A or Option B in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the board may promulgate rules concerning the addition of classes of eligible persons to be designated as a beneficiary under this section and for the rights of option beneficiaries of deceased disability retirees under § 24-7-704.

If a member's marital status changes after retirement due to the death of the member's spouse, or a divorce or marriage dissolution from the member's spouse who is also the member's designated beneficiary, then the member may elect to cancel any optional plan designating the former spouse as a beneficiary.

A member's election under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall cause the member to return to his or her lifetime benefit equivalent, to be effective the month following the system's receipt of the approved form.

A retirant who is receiving a single lifetime benefit and who marries after retirement may elect to cancel his or her single lifetime benefit and may elect an annuity providing continuing lifetime benefits to his or her spouse under rules promulgated by the board.

If a member fails to elect an option, his or her annuity shall be paid to him or her as a straight life annuity.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this section to the contrary, the residue beneficiary under § 24-7-709 may elect to cancel the form of annuity in effect and elect Option A — 100% Survivor Annuity upon the death of a retirant on or after July 1, 1989, if:

The retirant died within one (1) year following the effective date of retirement;

The retirant was receiving a straight life annuity; and

The residue beneficiary otherwise qualifies for an Option A — 100% Survivor Annuity.

The election to change may be made only one (1) time and shall be on a form approved by the system.

The election form must be received by the system within one hundred twenty (120) days of the death of the retiree.

Notwithstanding anything in this section to the contrary, a retirant who retired on or after July 1, 1994, may elect to cancel his or her election made at retirement for receiving an annuity and elect another option, provided that he or she:

Does so within one (1) year after July 1, 1995, or within one (1) year of retirement;

Files with the system a new election form approved by the system; and

Repays to the system the difference between the amount of the annuity received when he or she retired and the new annuity due as a result of the election change, plus interest from July 1, 1994, or his or her retirement date, whichever is later, to the date of payment in full.

The difference shall be calculated retroactively to July 1, 1994, or his or her retirement date, whichever is later.

The election to change shall be made only one (1) time.

The election change shall be effective retroactively to the effective date of his or her annuity.

The board shall:

Promulgate rules as necessary to administer this section; and

Institute fair procedures for members of the system, including without limitation:

Requirements for designating a beneficiary; and

Spousal election.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1977, No. 541, § 5; 1979, No. 681, § 7; 1983, No. 619, § 10; 1983, No. 665, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 1991, No. 51, § 1; 1995, No. 528, § 1; 1999, No. 395, §§ 1, 2; 1999, No. 866, § 7; 2005, No. 385, § 7; 2007, No. 97, § 12; 2011, No. 137, § 2; 2011, No. 557, § 1; 2015, No. 301, § 8; 2015, No. 375, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 293, §
5.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by No. 137 added (f).

The 2011 amendment by No. 557 deleted “duly” following “designation” throughout (a); substituted “Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” for “board” in (a)(2)(A)(i); rewrote former (a)(2)(A)(ii) and (a)(2)(B)(ii); substituted “the retirant” for “him or her” in (a)(2)(C)(iii); and added (a)(3).

The 2015 amendment by No. 301 deleted “but not thereafter” preceding “a member” in (a)(1).

The 2015 amendment by No. 375 inserted present (a)(2)(C)(iii) and redesignated former (a)(2)(C)(iii) through (v) as (a)(2)(C)(iv) through (vi); redesignated (b)(2)(A) as (b)(2); in (b)(2), substituted “an annuity” for “Option B — 50% Survivor Annuity” and “under rules promulgated by the board” for “but only if the election is on a form approved by the system and is received by the system within six (6) months after the date of marriage”; and deleted former (b)(2)(B).

The 2017 amendment rewrote (b)(1).

24-7-707. Deferred retirement.

If an active member becomes inactive before the member reaches sixty (60) years of age and completes five (5) years of actual and reciprocal service or if the member has not obtained a refund or participated in a buyout plan of the member's rights to benefits in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System under § 24-7-505, then the member is entitled to a deferred annuity when the member becomes sixty (60) years of age as provided in this section.

The member is eligible for deferred retirement if the member has not withdrawn his or her accumulated contributions from the members' deposit account, has not participated in a buyout plan of the member's rights to benefits in the system under § 24-7-505, and is not employed in a position covered by another retirement plan that is supported wholly or in part by state contributions if the member's being vested is based on the other system service.

Upon approval by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, the deferred annuity shall commence as of the first day of the calendar month following the date the written application is received by the system.

A member shall elect an option provided for in § 24-7-706 at the time of filing the written application.

An inactive member's deferred annuity shall be a life annuity as provided for in § 24-7-705.

In the event the inactive member dies before qualifying for deferred retirement, no benefits whatsoever shall be paid except under the provisions of § 24-7-711.

If a member fails to submit a complete deferred retirement application within six (6) calendar months of the effective date of benefits, including all additional documentation required by the system, the application shall be void unless an extension is granted by the system.

A member may cancel an application for deferred retirement benefits any time before two (2) calendar months from the effective date of benefits.

The member shall notify the system of cancellation in writing. Upon cancellation, the member shall be eligible for active membership in the system.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, §§ 6-13; 1977, No. 541, §§ 5-8; 1977, No. 640, §§ 1, 2; 1977, No. 727, § 1; 1979, No. 681, §§ 5-12; 1979, No. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 14, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 6, 7; 1981, No. 435, § 2; 1983, No. 17, § 2; 1983, No. 127, § 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 9-11; 1983, No. 665, §§ 9-11; 1985, No. 805, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 1995, No. 281, § 1; 1997, No. 1053, § 8; 2007, No. 97, § 13; 2009, No. 468, § 18; 2011, No. 45, § 10; 2013, No. 606, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment subdivided (a)(1); inserted “when the member becomes sixty (60) years of age” in (a)(1)(A); inserted “if the member's being vested is based on the other system service” in (a)(1)(B); deleted (a)(2)(A) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly; deleted “have the right to” in (a)(3); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment added (d) and (e).

The 2013 amendment,
in (a)(1)(A), substituted “and completes” for “upon completion of” and inserted “or if the member has not obtained a
refund or participated in a buyout plan of the member's rights to benefits in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System under § 24-7-505, then”; and inserted “has not participated in a buyout plan of the member's rights to benefits in the system under § 24-7-505” in (a)(1)(B).

24-7-708. Employment of retired members by covered employers.

Effective July 1, 2009, after terminating employment under § 24-7-502 or reaching the age of normal retirement, a retirant may:

Accept employment with an employer covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System without a limitation of his or her retirement annuity; and

Continue to receive his or her monthly retirement annuity.

Employers covered by the system that hire an employee who meets the conditions under subsection (a) of this section shall report the hiring of the retirant to the system in a time and a manner that the system may reasonably require.

A retirant who receives monthly benefits and is employed by a covered employer shall not accrue additional service credit.

For a retired member employed in a position covered by the system, the covered employer shall remit the contributions on all salary paid to the retirant in an amount equal to the employer contribution rate applicable to active members.

Contributions shall be paid by the employer and are not the responsibility of the retirant.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.

A covered employer that employs retirants is subject to the rules adopted by the board.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, § 13; 1977, No. 541, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 1991, No. 43, § 7; 1991, No. 239, § 1; 1995, No. 1293, § 1; 1997, No. 384, § 1; 1999, No. 30, § 1; 2001, No. 1146, § 2; 2005, No. 911, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 14; 2007, No. 612, § 1; 2007, No. 698, § 1; 2009, No. 743, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

24-7-709. Disposition of member contributions — Residue.

If a retirant and his or her option annuitants, if any, die before receiving annuity payments equal to the member's residue amount, then the residue amount shall be paid to such persons as the retirant shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

As used in this section, “residue” means the difference between the accumulated contributions and regular interest credited to the retirement reserve account as of the member's retirement effective date and the total amount of annuities paid.

If a retirant and his or her option annuitants die and the member has failed to designate a beneficiary or if all designated beneficiaries have predeceased the retirant, the residue shall be paid to the retirant's estate.

If upon the termination of the option annuity no surviving beneficiary designated by the member survives and it is impracticable to make payment to the member's estate, the residue shall be forfeited to the trust assets of the system subject to any valid claim of the member's estate under § 24-7-734.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 2005, No. 494, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 15; 2009, No. 468, § 19.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

24-7-710. Survivor annuity benefits.

If an active member with five (5) or more years of actual and reciprocal service, including credited service for the year immediately preceding his or her death, dies before the receipt of retirement benefits from the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, then the benefits provided in this section shall be paid to eligible survivors.

An immediately eligible survivor is entitled to receive monthly benefits beginning the month after the death of the member if the survivor application is filed with the system within three (3) months of the death of the member, otherwise the monthly benefits shall begin the month that the survivor application is filed with the system.

If an immediately eligible survivor or the minor survivor's guardian or legal representative fails to complete the application process within six (6) calendar months after the application required under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section is filed, including the submission of any additional documentation required by the system, the application shall be void unless an extension is granted by the system.

Unless the member otherwise directs an alternative beneficiary by using a beneficiary form approved by the system, a member's surviving spouse, who was married to the member for at least the two (2) years immediately preceding the member's death, shall receive an annuity computed in the same manner in all respects as if the member had retired on the date of the member's death and elected Option A under § 24-7-706 to provide one hundred percent (100%) survivor annuity benefits, including benefits applicable under § 24-7-713, for his or her spouse.

The system shall continue to pay any benefits applicable under § 24-7-713 for an eligible surviving spouse, including a spouse who began receiving benefits on or after July 1, 2009.

If a surviving spouse is immediately eligible to receive a monthly benefit immediately after the death of a member, the immediately eligible surviving spouse is entitled to receive monthly benefits beginning the month after the death of the member if the survivor application is filed with the system within three (3) months of the death of the member, otherwise the monthly benefits shall begin the month that the survivor application is filed with the system if at the time of the member's death the member had:

Accumulated twenty-five (25) years or more of credited service and qualified as eligible to receive a retirement annuity under §§ 24-7-701 and 24-7-702; or

Reached sixty (60) years of age and qualified as eligible to receive a retirement annuity under § 24-7-707.

If an immediately eligible spouse fails to complete the application process within six (6) calendar months after the application required under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) of this section is filed, including the submission of all additional documentation required by the system, the application shall be void unless an extension is granted by the system.

If the surviving spouse is not immediately eligible to receive monthly benefits under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section, the surviving spouse's benefits shall begin the later of either the month following the date the member would have been eligible to receive benefits had the member survived or the date that an application for a surviving spouse's benefits is filed with the system.

If a surviving spouse becomes eligible for surviving spouse benefits and fails to complete the application process within six (6) calendar months after the application required under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) of this section is filed, including the submission of any additional documentation required by the system, the application shall be void unless an extension is granted by the system.

If the surviving spouse is eligible to receive the survivor annuity and the member had not reached sixty (60) years of age at the time of the member's death, the surviving spouse may elect to defer receipt of the annuity until the member would have reached sixty (60) years of age, and the surviving spouse's benefits shall not be reduced under the early retirement provisions of § 24-7-702.

The surviving spouse's benefits under this section are payable for the surviving spouse's lifetime.

If the member directs an alternative beneficiary by using a beneficiary form approved by the system, the member may designate one or more residual beneficiaries to receive a lump-sum payment of the member's residue amount under § 24-7-709 in lieu of the member's surviving spouse.

If at the time of the member's death there are no dependent children and the surviving spouse who is eligible to receive the annuity under this subsection files with the system a written waiver of his or her right to the spousal annuity, a lump-sum distribution of the deceased member's accumulated contributions plus regular interest may be made to the surviving spouse.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.

A surviving dependent child of the member shall receive an annuity in an amount equal to one percent (1%) of the member's highest salary year for each quarter of a year credited as actual service in the system but not to exceed twenty (20) quarters of a year that are credited as actual service in the system for up to a maximum of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

If the member's highest salary year occurs in the year that the member died, the system shall calculate the surviving dependent child's annuity on the basis of a full year of salary by the member.

If a member has more than three (3) surviving dependent children, the aggregate amount of the surviving dependent children's annuity shall not exceed the lesser of sixty percent (60%) of the member's highest salary year or sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) per year and shall be divided equally among the surviving dependent children.

A child shall be considered a dependent child and eligible for the dependent child annuity until he or she reaches eighteen (18) years of age.

The child of a deceased member is considered a dependent child and is eligible for the dependent child annuity at eighteen (18) years of age or older, but not older than twenty-three (23) years of age, if the dependent child stays continuously enrolled as a full-time student at an accredited secondary school, college, or university.

Regardless of age, a deceased member's child who has been deemed physically or mentally incapacitated by a court of competent jurisdiction is eligible to receive a dependent child annuity for as long as the incapacity exists.

When a dependent child ceases to be a dependent or dies, his or her share of the annuity shall terminate.

For the purposes of § 24-7-709 related to the disposition of a member's residue amount, a survivor annuity received from the member's deposit account under this section shall be considered annuity payments received by the member or his or her designated beneficiary and shall offset any disposition of residue payable under § 24-7-709 to the estate of the member or to an alternate payee.

If the member had previously received benefits from the system and has not repaid in full all amounts payable by him or her to the system, the annuity amounts otherwise provided by this section shall be withheld until the total amount owed to the system is repaid.

For eligibility under this section, a member is considered active for an additional fiscal year following the last fiscal year that the member renders actual service to a covered employer and obtains at least one-fourth (¼) of a year of service credit.

In addition, a member is considered active for eligibility under this section if in the fiscal year of a member's death, the member earned at least ten (10) days of service credit in each quarter before and including the quarter of the member's death.

Service credit used in calculating any benefits paid under this section means days of service, including paid sick leave covered by the employer.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, §§ 6-13; 1977, No. 541, §§ 5-8; 1977, No. 640, §§ 1, 2; 1977, No. 727, § 1; 1979, No. 681, §§ 5-12; 1979, No. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 14, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 6, 7; 1981, No. 435, § 2; 1983, No. 17, § 2; 1983, No. 127, § 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 9-11; 1983, No. 665, §§ 9-11; 1985, No. 504, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 1987, No. 4, § 3; 1997, No. 1053, § 9; 2003, No. 853, § 2; 2005, No. 385, § 8; 2005, No. 494, § 2; 2007, No. 97, § 16; 2009, No. 1324, § 1; 2011, No. 45, § 11; 2011, No. 137, § 3; 2013, No. 571, §§ 1-3; 2017, No. 243, §§
1-3; 2017, No. 505, §§ 1-4; 2019, No. 210, § 1; 2019, No. 427, § 13.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendment by No. 45 added (b)(1)(A)(ii); and inserted “including benefits applicable under § 24-7-713” in (b)(1)(A)(i).

The 2011 amendment by No. 137 added (g).

The 2013 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); deleted “and reciprocal” following “years of actual” in (a)(1); added (a)(2); rewrote the introductory language of (b)(1)(B); in (b)(1)(C), inserted “immediately,” “monthly,” and “later of either the,” and inserted “or the date that an application for a surviving spouse's benefits is filed with the system”; and deleted former (e).

The 2017 amendment by No. 243 substituted “Unless the member otherwise directs an alternative beneficiary by using a beneficiary form approved by the system, a” for “The” in (b)(1)(A)(i); and added (b)(1)(F) and (b)(3).

The 2017 amendment by No. 505 inserted “and reciprocal” in (a)(1); added (a)(2)(B), (b)(1)(B)(ii) and (b)(1)(C)(ii); rewrote (c)(1)(A)(i); and, in (c)(1)(B), inserted “the lesser of” and “or sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) per year”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 210 inserted “and eligible for the dependent child annuity” in (c)(2)(A); rewrote (c)(2)(B)(i); and in (c)(2)(B)(ii), substituted “Regardless of age, a deceased member’s child” for “Any child”, and deleted “regardless of age” from the end.

The 2019 amendment by No. 427, in (d), substituted “a member’s residue amount, a survivor annuity received from the member’s deposit account” for “residue, any amounts received from the member’s deposit account in the form of a survivor annuity” and added “to the estate of the member or to an alternate payee”.

24-7-711. Refund of member contributions upon termination.

If a member discontinues covered employment, the member may elect to be paid a refund of his or her contributions and regular interest credited to the member's deposit account within six (6) months following the date the member's written application is filed with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Any contributions remaining on deposit shall accrue regular interest at the end of each fiscal year as provided by law.

If an active member dies and a survivor annuity is not payable under § 24-7-710, the member's accumulated contributions and regular interest to the time of payment shall be paid to such persons as the member shall have nominated by a written designation that is executed by the member and filed with the system.

If there are no designated persons surviving the member, the accumulated contributions are payable to the member's estate.

If no annuity is payable to a dependent child on account of the member's death and if the sole beneficiary who can receive the annuity is the member's surviving spouse, then the member's surviving spouse may elect to receive a refund of accumulated contributions and regular interest paid under this subchapter.

For members dying before July 1, 2011, with an unpaid residual balance, interest on the deceased member's accumulated contributions under this subsection shall cease to accrue after July 1, 2011.

Interest on a deceased member's accumulated contributions under this subsection shall cease to accrue on the July 1 after the member's death.

A member or surviving spouse who elects to receive a refund of member contributions under this section also cancels all the member's service credit, including noncontributory service credit, and all membership rights and beneficiary designations in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, §§ 6-13; 1977, No. 541, §§ 5-8; 1977, No. 640, §§ 1, 2; 1977, No. 727, § 1; 1979, No. 681, §§ 5-12; 1979, No. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 14, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 6, 7; 1981, No. 435, § 2; 1983, No. 17, § 2; 1983, No. 127, § 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 9-11; 1983, No. 665, §§ 9-11; 1985, No. 805, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443; Acts 2005, No. 494, § 3; 2007, No. 97, § 17; 2009, No. 468, § 20; 2011, No. 136, § 1; 2011, No. 976, § 1; 2013, No. 140, § 5; 2017, No. 293, §
6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendment by No. 136 added (b)(4) and (5).

The 2011 amendment by No. 976 added (c).

The 2013 amendment, in (c), inserted “and all membership rights and beneficiary designations”
and substituted “Arkansas Teacher Retirement
System” for “system.”

The 2017 amendment substituted “law” for “§ 24-7-410(d)” in (a)(2).

24-7-712. Determination of benefit program.

Any member last terminating teacher service before July 1, 1973, shall receive, or shall have paid on his or her behalf, benefits in accordance with the benefit program in effect at the time of retirement.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, §§ 6-13; 1977, No. 541, §§ 5-8; 1977, No. 640, §§ 1, 2; 1977, No. 727, § 1; 1979, No. 681, §§ 5-12; 1979, No. 776, §§ 1, 2; 1981, No. 14, § 1; 1981, No. 365, §§ 6, 7; 1981, No. 435, § 2; 1983, No. 17, § 2; 1983, No. 127, § 2; 1983, No. 619, §§ 9-11; 1983, No. 665, §§ 9-11; 1985, No. 805, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1443.

24-7-713. Retirement annuity — Simple cost of living adjustment and monthly benefit stipend — Definition.

July 1 of each year, retirants, survivors, participants in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan, and annuity beneficiaries who have been receiving monthly benefits for the previous twelve (12) months shall receive a simple cost of living adjustment.

The cost of living adjustment under this section is calculated by multiplying one hundred percent (100%) of the member's base retirement annuity times three percent (3%).

The redetermined amount shall not be less than the base amount.

As used in this section, “base amount” means the amount of the benefit payable at retirement plus any one-time increases granted by legislative change after the member's effective date of retirement benefits, excluding the simple cost of living adjustment under this section and the benefit stipend under subsection (d) of this section.

The redetermined amount under this subsection is not considered a benefit enhancement under the limitations under § 24-1-106.

A member with at least ten (10) years of actual service in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System is eligible to receive a benefit stipend in addition to his or her monthly retirement benefit.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System may modify the amount of the benefit stipend from a maximum of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per month to not less than one dollar ($1.00) per month for eligible benefit participants as a benefit supplement in addition to the cost of living adjustment under subsection (a) of this section.

A benefit stipend increase or decrease adopted by the board shall apply to a complete fiscal year and shall remain in effect until adjusted by the board subject to the limitations under subdivision (b)(5) of this section.

The board may adjust the benefit stipend amount by resolution at a meeting of the board.

The board shall not reduce the benefit stipend unless the:

Arkansas Teacher Retirement System's actuary certifies to the board that the amortization period exceeds eighteen (18) years; and

Board determines that a reduction in the benefit stipend is prudent to maintain actuarial soundness.

The board may phase in an increase or decrease of the benefit stipend.

If a member was eligible for a benefit stipend, the benefit stipend shall be applied to the monthly benefit of the member's designated survivor and option beneficiary.

Nothing contained in this section shall require the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to pay any portion of the benefits provided for in this section.

The board may remove by board resolution the benefit stipend from the base amount of current retirants and option beneficiaries if the board determines that the removal of the benefit stipend from the base amount is prudent in order to maintain actuarial soundness.

The board may phase in the removal of the benefit stipend from the base amount of current retirant and option beneficiaries by board resolution.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 9; 1975, No. 549, § 8; 1979, No. 776, § 2; 1981, No. 14, § 1; 1983, No. 127, § 2; 1985, No. 162, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 70-1443; Acts 1987, No. 802, § 2; 1991, No. 44, § 3; 1999, No. 400, § 1; 1999, No. 1066, § 7; 1999, No. 1590, § 3; 2001, No. 360, § 1; 2001, No. 742, § 2; 2003, No. 347, § 1; 2003, No. 853, § 3; 2007, No. 297, § 1; 2009, No. 468, § 21; 2011, No. 45, §§ 12, 13; 2013, No. 603, § 1; 2017, No. 782, §§ 1-3; 2019, No. 427, § 14.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, the amendment of subsection (b) by Acts 1999, No. 400 is deemed to be superseded by the amendment by Acts 1999, No. 1590. Acts 1999, No. 400 amended subsection (b) to read as follows:

“(b)(1)

Effective July 1, 1999, subject to the minimum financial conditions set forth in § 24-7-718, retirees shall receive an increase in benefits of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per month, provided that the board of trustees may elect and is granted authority to increase the benefit to retirees in an amount determined by the board except such benefit increase shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per month.

“(2)

Members retiring after July 1, 1999, shall receive an additional benefit of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per month over and above their regular annuity, provided the board may elect and is granted authority to increase the additional benefit to members retiring in an amount determined by the board except such additional benefit shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per month.

“(3)

If an individual is also receiving benefits as a result of credited service under one (1) or more of the other reciprocal systems, as such systems enumerated in Arkansas Code 24-2-401, that individual shall receive a prorated portion of the amount from the system.

“(4)

The prorated portion shall be determined by dividing the years of credited service with the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System by the member's or deceased member's total years of credited service with all reciprocal systems provided the individual receiving such benefits shall receive the additional amounts set out in subsection (b) of this section in total from such systems if the member or deceased member was employed at least five (5) years in each of the reciprocal systems.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(4); deleted (b)(4); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment inserted “participants in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan” in (a)(1); and, in (b)(3), substituted “all members” for “all individuals” and “the member” for “the individual.”

The 2013 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2017 amendment added “and the benefit stipend under subsection (d) of this section” in (a)(4); rewrote (b)(4); and added (b)(5) and (d).

The 2019 amendment added (b)(1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions in (b) accordingly; deleted “Effective July 1, 2013” from the beginning of (b)(2); updated an internal reference in (b)(3); and added (b)(7).

24-7-714. Increase in monthly benefits — Acts 1979, No. 655, and Acts 1981, No. 885.

The monthly retirement benefit payable to retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System who were retired on or before July 1, 1978, and who were receiving benefits on July 1, 1979, shall be increased as follows:

For all benefits to retirants and beneficiaries of the system whose total credited service is before July 1, 1961, a monthly benefit increase equal to one dollar ($1.00) per each year of credited service;

For all benefits to retirants and beneficiaries of the system which are based in whole or in part upon credited service rendered after July 1, 1961, a monthly benefit increase equal to seventy-five cents (75¢) per each year of credited service;

For benefit increases authorized by subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section, fractional years of service shall be disregarded, and the increase shall be added to the monthly annuity after the annual postretirement increase based on the consumer price index has been applied to the retirant's base annuity; and

In the event that there is more than one (1) beneficiary or survivor of a member or retirant receiving benefits, the increases in subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section shall be based upon the member's total credited service. The benefit increase so determined shall be divided between the survivors or beneficiaries in proportion to their base annuities.

For retirements effective after July 1, 1978, for which a monthly benefit is payable for the month of July 1981 or later, calculations shall be made as provided in subdivisions (b)(1) and (2) of this section. If the monthly benefit calculated using subdivision (b)(1) of this section is more than the monthly benefit calculated using subdivision (b)(2) of this section, then the difference shall be paid to the retirant as a monthly benefit increase, subject to the provisions of subdivisions (b)(3)-(6) of this section, as follows:

Calculate the monthly annuity payable to the member under § 24-7-705, based on the provisions of § 24-7-705, his or her salary record, and his or her service record, all as of July 1, 1978, and add seventy-five cents (75¢) for each year of the member's credited service rendered before July 1, 1978;

Calculate the monthly annuity payable to the member under the provisions of § 24-7-705 in effect at the time of the member's retirement;

For benefit increases authorized by this subsection, fractional years of service shall be disregarded. The increase shall be added to the monthly annuity after the annual postretirement increase based on the consumer price index has been applied to the retirant's base annuity;

In the event that there is more than one (1) beneficiary or survivor of a member or retirant receiving benefits, the increases in this subsection shall be based upon the member's total credited service, and the benefit increase so determined shall be divided between the survivors or beneficiaries in proportion to their base annuities;

Any benefit increase created by this subsection shall be effective at retirement but not for any month before July 1981; and

If there is any change in § 24-7-705 after the member's retirement, the amount under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall be recalculated using the changed provisions, and the benefit increase provided by this subsection shall be changed correspondingly.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 655, § 1; 1981, No. 885, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2511.20.

Cross References.

Increased benefits, § 24-4-610.